test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_caaci_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čääci: # ok
    čääci+N+Sg+Nom:   čääci
    čääci+N+Sg+Gen:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Acc:   čääsi
    čääci+N+Sg+Ill:   čáácán
    čääci+N+Sg+Loc:   čääsist
    čääci+N+Sg+Com:   čassijn
    čääci+N+Sg+Abe:   čäˊsittáá
    čääci+N+Ess:      čääccin
    čääci+N+Par:      čääccid
    čääci+N+Pl+Nom:   čääsih
    čääci+N+Pl+Gen:  [čaasij, čaˊsij]
    čääci+N+Pl+Acc:   čaasijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Ill:   čassijd
    čääci+N+Pl+Loc:   čaasijn
    čääci+N+Pl+Com:   čaˊsijguin
    čääci+N+Pl+Abe:   čaˊsijttáá

  Noun - čeeci: # ok
    čeeci+N+Sg+Nom:   čeeci
    čeeci+N+Sg+Gen:   čeesi
    čeeci+N+Sg+Acc:   čeesi
    čeeci+N+Sg+Ill:   čiäcán
    čeeci+N+Sg+Loc:  čeesist
    čeeci+N+Sg+Com:   čessijn
    čeeci+N+Sg+Abe:   čeˊsittáá
    čeeci+N+Ess:      čeeccin
    čeeci+N+Par:      čeeccid
    čeeci+N+Pl+Nom:   čeesih
    čeeci+N+Pl+Gen:  [čeesij, čeˊsij]
    čeeci+N+Pl+Acc:   čeesijd
    čeeci+N+Pl+Ill:   čessijd
    čeeci+N+Pl+Loc:   čeesijn
    čeeci+N+Pl+Com:   čeˊsijguin
    čeeci+N+Pl+Abe:   čeˊsijttáá
    
  Noun - vyehi: # ok
    vyehi+N+Sg+Nom:   vyehi
    vyehi+N+Sg+Gen:   vyeṿi
    vyehi+N+Sg+Acc:   vyeṿi
    vyehi+N+Sg+Ill:   vuáhán
    vyehi+N+Sg+Loc:   vyeṿist
    vyehi+N+Sg+Com:   vuovˊvijn
    vyehi+N+Sg+Abe:   vyeˊṿittáá
    vyehi+N+Ess:      vyehin
    vyehi+N+Par:      vyehid
    vyehi+N+Pl+Nom:   vyeṿih
    vyehi+N+Pl+Gen:  [vuoṿij, vuoˊṿij]
    vyehi+N+Pl+Acc:   vuoṿijd
    vyehi+N+Pl+Ill:   vuovˊvijd
    vyehi+N+Pl+Loc:   vuoṿijn
    vyehi+N+Pl+Com:   vuoˊṿijguin
    vyehi+N+Pl+Abe:   vuoˊṿijttáá
    
  Noun - čielgi: # ok
    čielgi+N+Sg+Nom:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Gen:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Acc:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Ill:   čiälgán
    čielgi+N+Sg+Loc:   čielgist
    čielgi+N+Sg+Com:   čielˊgijn
    čielgi+N+Sg+Abe:   čieˊlgittáá
    čielgi+N+Ess:      čielgin
    čielgi+N+Par:      čielgid
    čielgi+N+Pl+Nom:   čielgih
    čielgi+N+Pl+Gen:  [čielgij, čieˊlgij]
    čielgi+N+Pl+Acc:   čielgijd
    čielgi+N+Pl+Ill:   čielˊgijd
    čielgi+N+Pl+Loc:   čielgijn
    čielgi+N+Pl+Com:   čieˊlgijguin
    čielgi+N+Pl+Abe:   čieˊlgijttáá
